Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7347.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Prior authorization restrictions for rehabilitative and habilitative services.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
rehabilitative or habilitative services including, but not limited to, physical therapy services for the
first twelve (12) visits of each new episode of care. After the twelve (12) visits of each new episode
of care, an individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more
frequently than every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For
purposes of this section, "new episode of care" means treatment for a new or recurring condition
for which an insured has not been treated by the provider within the previous ninety (90) days.
(b) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
physical medicine or rehabilitation services provided to patients with chronic pain for the first
ninety (90) days following diagnosis in order to provide the necessary nonpharmacologic
management of the pain. After the first ninety (90) days following a chronic pain diagnosis, an
individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more frequently than
every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For purposes of this
subsection, "chronic pain" means pain that persists or recurs for more than three (3) months.
(c) An individual or group health insurance plan shall respond to a prior authorization
request for services or visits in an ongoing plan of care for rehabilitative or habilitative services

within twenty-four (24) hours. If an individual or group health insurance plan requires more
information to render a decision on the prior authorization request, the individual or group health
insurance plan shall notify the patient and the provider within twenty-four (24) hours of the initial
request with the information that is needed to complete the prior authorization request including,
but not limited to, the specific tests and measures needed from the patient and provider. An
individual or group health insurance plan shall render a decision on the prior authorization request
within twenty-four (24) hours of receiving the requested information.
(d) A prior authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services is deemed to be approved
if an individual or group health insurance plan:
(1) Fails to timely answer a prior authorization request in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section, including due to a failure of the individual or group health insurance plan’s prior
authorization platform or process; or
(2) Informs a provider that prior authorization is not required orally, via an online platform
or program, through the patient's health plan documents or by any other means.
(e) An individual or group health insurance plan shall provide a procedure for providers
and insureds to obtain retroactive authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services that are
medically necessary covered benefits. An individual or group health insurance plan shall not deny
coverage for medically necessary services for failure to obtain a prior authorization, if a medical
necessity determination can be made after the rehabilitative or habilitative services have been
provided and the services would have been covered benefits if prior authorization had been
obtained.
(f) An individual or group health insurance plan’s failure to approve a prior authorization
for all rehabilitative or habilitative services or visits in a plan of care is subject to the same appeal
rights as a denial under the health insurance commissioner’s rule regarding health plan
accountability and the provider's network agreement with the carrier, if any.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual or group health
insurance plan from performing a retrospective medical necessity review.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled " Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations " is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Prior authorization restrictions for rehabilitative and habilitative services.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
rehabilitative or habilitative services including, but not limited to, physical therapy services for the
first twelve (12) visits of each new episode of care. After the twelve (12) visits of each new episode
of care, an individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more
LC004486 - Page 2 of 7

frequently than every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For
purposes of this section, "new episode of care" means treatment for a new or recurring condition
for which an insured has not been treated by the provider within the previous ninety (90) days.
(b) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
physical medicine or rehabilitation services provided to patients with chronic pain for the first
ninety (90) days following diagnosis in order to provide the necessary nonpharmacologic
management of the pain. After the first ninety (90) days following a chronic pain diagnosis, an
individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more frequently than
every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For purposes of this
subsection, "chronic pain" means pain that persists or recurs for more than three (3) months.
(c) An individual or group health insurance plan shall respond to a prior authorization
request for services or visits in an ongoing plan of care for rehabilitative or habilitative services
within twenty-four (24) hours. If an individual or group health insurance plan requires more
information to render a decision on the prior authorization request, the individual or group health
insurance plan shall notify the patient and the provider within twenty-four (24) hours of the initial
request with the information that is needed to complete the prior authorization request including,
but not limited to, the specific tests and measures needed from the patient and provider. An
individual or group health insurance plan shall render a decision on the prior authorization request
within twenty-four (24) hours of receiving the requested information.
(d) A prior authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services is deemed to be approved
if an individual or group health insurance plan:
(1) Fails to timely answer a prior authorization request in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section, including due to a failure of the individual or group health insurance plan’s prior
authorization platform or process; or
(2) Informs a provider that prior authorization is not required orally, via an online platform
or program, through the patient's health plan documents or by any other means.
(e) An individual or group health insurance plan shall provide a procedure for providers
and insureds to obtain retroactive authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services that are
medically necessary covered benefits. An individual or group health insurance plan shall not deny
coverage for medically necessary services for failure to obtain a prior authorization, if a medical
necessity determination can be made after the rehabilitative or habilitative services have been
provided and the services would have been covered benefits if prior authorization had been
obtained.
(f) An individual or group health insurance plan’s failure to approve a prior authorization
LC004486 - Page 3 of 7

for all rehabilitative or habilitative services or visits in a plan of care is subject to the same appeal
rights as a denial under the health insurance commissioner’s rule regarding health plan
accountability and the provider's network agreement with the carrier, if any.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual or group health
insurance plan from performing a retrospective medical necessity review.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled " Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations " is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Prior authorization restrictions for rehabilitative and habilitative services.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
rehabilitative or habilitative services including, but not limited to, physical therapy services for the
first twelve (12) visits of each new episode of care. After the twelve (12) visits of each new episode
of care, an individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more
frequently than every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For
purposes of this section, "new episode of care" means treatment for a new or recurring condition
for which an insured has not been treated by the provider within the previous ninety (90) days.
(b) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
physical medicine or rehabilitation services provided to patients with chronic pain for the first
ninety (90) days following diagnosis in order to provide the necessary nonpharmacologic
management of the pain. After the first ninety (90) days following a chronic pain diagnosis, an
individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more frequently than
every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For purposes of this
subsection, "chronic pain" means pain that persists or recurs for more than three (3) months.
(c) An individual or group health insurance plan shall respond to a prior authorization
request for services or visits in an ongoing plan of care for rehabilitative or habilitative services
within twenty-four (24) hours. If an individual or group health insurance plan requires more
information to render a decision on the prior authorization request, the individual or group health
insurance plan shall notify the patient and the provider within twenty-four (24) hours of the initial
request with the information that is needed to complete the prior authorization request including,
but not limited to, the specific tests and measures needed from the patient and provider. An
individual or group health insurance plan shall render a decision on the prior authorization request
within twenty-four (24) hours of receiving the requested information.
(d) A prior authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services is deemed to be approved
if an individual or group health insurance plan:
(1) Fails to timely answer a prior authorization request in accordance with subsection (c)
LC004486 - Page 4 of 7

of this section, including due to a failure of the individual or group health insurance plan’s prior
authorization platform or process; or
(2) Informs a provider that prior authorization is not required orally, via an online platform
or program, through the patient's health plan documents or by any other means.
(e) An individual or group health insurance plan shall provide a procedure for providers
and insureds to obtain retroactive authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services that are
medically necessary covered benefits. An individual or group health insurance plan shall not deny
coverage for medically necessary services for failure to obtain a prior authorization, if a medical
necessity determination can be made after the rehabilitative or habilitative services have been
provided and the services would have been covered benefits if prior authorization had been
obtained.
(f) An individual or group health insurance plan’s failure to approve a prior authorization
for all rehabilitative or habilitative services or visits in a plan of care is subject to the same appeal
rights as a denial under the health insurance commissioner’s rule regarding health plan
accountability and the provider's network agreement with the carrier, if any.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual or group health
insurance plan from performing a retrospective medical necessity review.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled " Health Maintenance
Organizations " is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Prior authorization restrictions for rehabilitative and habilitative services.
(a) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
rehabilitative or habilitative services including, but not limited to, physical therapy services for the
first twelve (12) visits of each new episode of care. After the twelve (12) visits of each new episode
of care, an individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more
frequently than every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For
purposes of this section, "new episode of care" means treatment for a new or recurring condition
for which an insured has not been treated by the provider within the previous ninety (90) days.
(b) An individual or group health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
physical medicine or rehabilitation services provided to patients with chronic pain for the first
ninety (90) days following diagnosis in order to provide the necessary nonpharmacologic
management of the pain. After the first ninety (90) days following a chronic pain diagnosis, an
individual or group health insurance plan may not require prior authorization more frequently than
every six (6) visits or every thirty (30) days, whichever time period is longer. For purposes of this
subsection, "chronic pain" means pain that persists or recurs for more than three (3) months.
LC004486 - Page 5 of 7

(c) An individual or group health insurance plan shall respond to a prior authorization
request for services or visits in an ongoing plan of care for rehabilitative or habilitative services
within twenty-four (24) hours. If an individual or group health insurance plan requires more
information to render a decision on the prior authorization request, the individual or group health
insurance plan shall notify the patient and the provider within twenty-four (24) hours of the initial
request with the information that is needed to complete the prior authorization request including,
but not limited to, the specific tests and measures needed from the patient and provider. An
individual or group health insurance plan shall render a decision on the prior authorization request
within twenty-four (24) hours of receiving the requested information.
(d) A prior authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services is deemed to be approved
if an individual or group health insurance plan:
(1) Fails to timely answer a prior authorization request in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section, including due to a failure of the individual or group health insurance plan’s prior
authorization platform or process; or
(2) Informs a provider that prior authorization is not required orally, via an online platform
or program, through the patient's health plan documents or by any other means.
(e) An individual or group health insurance plan shall provide a procedure for providers
and insureds to obtain retroactive authorization for rehabilitative or habilitative services that are
medically necessary covered benefits. An individual or group health insurance plan shall not deny
coverage for medically necessary services for failure to obtain a prior authorization, if a medical
necessity determination can be made after the rehabilitative or habilitative services have been
provided and the services would have been covered benefits if prior authorization had been
obtained.
(f) An individual or group health insurance plan’s failure to approve a prior authorization
for all rehabilitative or habilitative services or visits in a plan of care is subject to the same appeal
rights as a denial under the health insurance commissioner’s rule regarding health plan
accountability and the provider's network agreement with the carrier, if any.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual or group health
insurance plan from performing a retrospective medical necessity review.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC004486
========
LC004486 - Page 6 of 7